Nebraska statutes.
Section 1.Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201068-601
Social security; policy.

(1) In order to extend to the employees of the state and its political
subdivisions and to the dependents and survivors of such employees the basic
protection accorded to others by the old age and survivors insurance system
embodied in the Social Security Act, it is hereby declared to be the policy
of the Legislature, subject to the limitations of sections 68-601 to 68-631, that such steps be
taken as to provide such protection to employees of the State of Nebraska
and its political subdivisions on as broad a basis as is permitted under the
act.

(2) In conformity with the policy of the Congress of the United States
of America, it is hereby declared to be the policy of the State of Nebraska
that the protection afforded employees in positions covered by retirement
systems on the date the state agreement is made applicable to service performed
in such positions or receiving periodic benefits under such retirement systems
at such time will not be impaired as a result of making the agreement so applicable
or as a result of legislative or executive action taken in anticipation or
in consequence thereof and that the benefits provided by the Social Security
Act and made available to employees of the State of Nebraska and of political
subdivisions thereof or instrumentalities jointly created by the state and
any other state or states, who are or may be members of a retirement system,
shall be supplementary to the benefits provided by such retirement system.

Laws 1951, c. 297, § 1, p. 977;

Laws 1955, c. 264, § 1, p. 812;

Laws 1990, LB 820, § 1;

Laws 2000, LB 1216, § 8;

Laws 2010, LB684, § 1.
July 15, 2010
A member of a county mental health board, appointed pursuant to statute, is an "officer of the state or a political subdivision thereof" and, as such, is an employee of the State of Nebraska for the purposes of the Social Security Act. Sullivan v. Hajny, 210 Neb. 481, 315 N.W.2d 443 (1982).